Wyoming, session 2026, HB0103.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 1-44-101 through 1-44-107 are created
to read:

CHAPTER 44
LAWSUITS AGAINST PUBLIC PARTICIPATION
HB0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0355

1-44-101. Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Wyoming
First Amendment Protection Act."

1-44-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this chapter:

(i) "Court" means any state or federal judicial
forum, any agency of the state or its political
subdivisions while conducting a contested case hearing and
any arbitration proceeding. For the purposes of the
immunity established in W.S. 1-44-103, "court" includes any
forum adjudicating a claim arising under Wyoming law;

(ii) "Person" includes an individual,
partnership, corporation, joint stock company or any other
association or entity, public or private;

(iii) "Privileged activities" means the exercise
of the right to petition, the right of freedom of speech,
HB0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0355
the right to assemble and the right of religious freedom
under the laws of Wyoming and the United States;

(iv) "SLAPP" means a strategic lawsuit against
public participation.

1-44-103. Strategic lawsuits against public
participation; immunity from suit.

(a) If an action of any kind is brought against a
person in any court and the action impacts or arises from
one (1) or more privileged activities, the person against
whom the action is brought shall be entitled to immunity
from suit on account of the person's privileged activity,
except as otherwise provided in this section. This immunity
protects against the burdens of litigation itself, not
merely against ultimate liability.

(b) The immunity from suit conferred in subsection
(a) of this section shall include but is not limited to the
following privileged activities:

HB0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0355
(i) Any written or oral statement made in
connection with or reporting on an issue under
consideration or review by a legislative, executive,
judicial, quasi-judicial, administrative or other
governmental entity or in any official proceeding
authorized by law, including pre-litigation communications
and demand letters;

(ii) Any written or oral statement made in a
place open to the public or a public forum in connection
with an issue of public interest or concern;

(iii) Any other conduct or communication that
seeks to influence, inform, facilitate or comment on a
matter of public interest or concern and that seeks to
procure governmental or public involvement or action.

(c) The immunity from suit conferred in subsection
(a) of this section may be raised in any dispositive motion
during a lawsuit or in any other pretrial motion that is
available under the rules of the court and where the
immunity may be raised. Upon the filing of a motion
asserting the immunity from suit conferred in subsection
HB0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0355
(a) of this section, the court shall determine the
immunity. If the party against whom an immunity motion is
filed moves to dismiss that party's own claims or amend the
party's complaint after a motion asserting immunity is
filed under this section, the motion to dismiss or amend
shall not moot the immunity motion, and the court may deem
the motion to dismiss or amend as evidence that the
immunity motion is meritorious.

(d) A person who asserts the immunity from suit
conferred in this section and for whom the immunity is
denied may file an interlocutory appeal for review of the
immunity separate from the merits of the underlying action.
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit the
authority of the Wyoming supreme court to adopt rules to
govern these appeals.

(e) The immunity from suit granted in this section
may be overcome if the person's conduct:

(i) Was knowingly false and defamatory or was
made in reckless disregard of the truth, including willful
ignorance or a refusal to investigate; or
HB0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0355

(ii) Constituted a true threat, incitement to
imminent lawless action, obscenity, child pornography or
any other established category of expression that falls
entirely outside constitutional protection.

(f) The party not asserting immunity may overcome the
immunity asserted under this section by presenting
sufficient evidence that an exception under subsection (e)
of this section applies, provided that the court shall not
weigh competing evidence unless the parties have waived the
right to a jury trial.

(g) The immunity from suit under this section shall
apply regardless of any cause of action, claim or
counterclaim asserted under the laws of this state.

(h) A person asserting the immunity from suit under
this section may request a stay of all or part of the
proceedings. The court shall consider granting a stay to
effectuate the purposes of this chapter. The party opposing
the stay bears the burden of demonstrating that denial is
necessary to prevent manifest injustice to that party.
HB0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0355

(j) No governmental entity and no public employee or
officer acting within the course and scope of the
employee's or officer's official duties or no other person
acting on behalf of and under color of authority of a
governmental entity shall assert or be granted the immunity
from suit conferred in this section for claims related to
the entity's exercise of governmental power or the
employee's or officer's official conduct.

(k) Any action dismissed based on the immunity from
suit provided in this section shall be a dismissal with
prejudice and shall be deemed an adjudication on the
merits.

1-44-104. Strategic lawsuits against public
participation immunity; attorney fees and costs; prevailing
party.

(a) The court shall award reasonable attorney fees,
costs and all reasonable expenses incurred to any person
who successfully asserts the immunity from suit provided in
W.S. 1-44-103. For purposes of this subsection, fees, costs
HB0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0355
and expenses shall include all reasonable costs and
expenses incurred in defending against the entire action,
including any appeals and all work undertaken to obtain,
enforce and collect an award under this section.

(b) For purposes of this section, a party that
successfully asserts the immunity from suit provided in
W.S. 1-44-103 against a governmental entity or employee or
officer of a governmental entity shall be entitled to be
awarded reasonable attorney fees, costs and expenses from
the governmental entity in accordance with this section.

1-44-105. Discretionary fees; nonmoving party for
immunity.

If a party invokes the immunity from suit provided in W.S.
1-44-103 and the court finds that the assertion of immunity
is frivolous, made in bad faith or was brought solely for
the purpose of delay or harassment, the court may award
reasonable attorney fees and costs to the nonmoving party
that the party incurred in responding to the assertion of
immunity from suit.

HB0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0355
1-44-106. Strategic lawsuits; countersuit and
counterclaims.

(a) A SLAPP-back cause of action shall exist against
any person who brings an action or claim against another
person, where:

(i) The action or claim impacts or arises from
one (1) or more privileged activities of the person against
whom the action or claim is brought;

(ii) The lawsuit or claim was brought against
the person for conduct or speech that was in furtherance of
any of the rights and freedoms protected by the first
amendment to the United States constitution or article 1,
sections 19, 20 or 21 of the Wyoming constitution; and

(iii) The lawsuit or claim was:

(A) Brought to harass, intimidate or punish
the person for exercising first amendment rights;

HB0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0355
(B) Brought to inhibit the exercise of
first amendment rights;

(C) Brought in reckless disregard of the
fact that the lawsuit or claim would have the effect of
harassment, intimidation or punishment of the exercise of
first amendment rights or the inhibition of the exercise of
those rights; or

(D) Continued for any of the reasons
specified in this paragraph after factual or legal
development made the lawsuit or claim no longer viable.

(b) A cause of action under this section accrues upon
the filing of the underlying action or claim. The cause of
action may be asserted as a counterclaim in the underlying
action without awaiting resolution of any motion asserting
immunity from suit, or may be brought as a separate action
during or after the underlying action. In the event that a
party filed a motion invoking the immunity from suit and
the nonmoving party withdrew the claim before the immunity
was adjudicated, there shall be a presumption that the suit
HB0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0355
was a SLAPP suit, and thus SLAPP-back liability is
established.

(c) Remedies available to a person prevailing in a
lawsuit under this section shall include:

(i) Compensatory damages, including but not
limited to damages for emotional distress and damages to
reputation. Damages awarded under this paragraph shall be
proportionate to the portion of the initial lawsuit to
which the immunity from suit would have applied;

(ii) Statutory damages of not less than five
thousand dollars ($5,000.00) and not more than one hundred
thousand dollars ($100,000.00);

(iii) Reasonable attorney fees and costs,
including attorney fees and costs incurred defending the
initial lawsuit, if those attorney fees and costs were not
awarded under W.S. 1-44-104, and the difference between any
attorney fees incurred in a prior lawsuit under this
chapter involving the same parties and the amount of
attorney fees actually awarded.
HB0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0355

(d) Any resident of this state against whom an action
is brought outside this state for claims that would have
been subject to this chapter if brought in the courts of
Wyoming may bring a lawsuit specified in this section
against the person who brought the foreign action, whether
in this state or in any other jurisdiction in which
personal jurisdiction and venue are applicable.

1-44-107. Applicability.

(a) This chapter shall be construed broadly to
effectuate the purpose of protecting the constitutional
rights of free speech, petition, assembly and the freedom
of religion.

(b) The immunity from suit available under this
chapter is in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other
immunity, privilege or defense available under the United
States constitution, the Wyoming constitution, state law,
federal law or the common law.

HB0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0355
(c) The immunity from suit provided in this chapter
is substantive law of the state of Wyoming. In federal
courts and foreign jurisdictions, any procedural provisions
of this chapter are severable from the substantive immunity
from suit provided in this chapter.

Section 2.

(a) The legislature finds and declares that:

(i) The rights to speak freely on matters of
public concern, to assemble, to petition and of religious
freedom are fundamental constitutional rights protected by
the first amendment to the United States constitution and
article 1, sections 19, 20 and 21 of the Wyoming
constitution;

(ii) Lawsuits or other legal actions filed for
the purpose of chilling, punishing or retaliating against
the legitimate exercise of these rights are commonly known
as strategic lawsuits against public participation;

HB0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0355
(iii) Strategic lawsuits against public
participation threaten the full enjoyment of constitutional
rights and impose undue financial and emotional burdens on
citizens;

(iv) It is in the public interest to grant
immunity from suit, similar to the qualified immunity
afforded to public officials acting within their official
duties and discretionary authority, to persons who exercise
these constitutional rights, unless that exercise falls
outside of constitutional protection;

(v) The immunity from strategic lawsuits against
public participation is only truly effective when it is a
substantive immunity from suit rather than a limited
procedural mechanism;

(vi) The immunity from suit established by this
act is substantive law of the state of Wyoming that defines
the scope of state-law claims and shall apply wherever
these claims are adjudicated;

HB0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0355
(vii) This immunity from suit would be
irrevocably lost without the right to an interlocutory
appeal.

Section 3.

(a) This act shall apply to:

(i) All causes of action accruing on and after
the effective date of this act;

(ii) Any action pending on the effective date of
this act, if:

(A) The action is based on privileged
activities as defined by W.S. 1-44-102(a)(ii);

(B) No dispositive motion has been ruled
upon as of the effective date of this act; and

(C) The court, in its discretion,
determines that the application of this act would not cause
manifest injustice to any party.
HB0103

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0355

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0103